Montana, session 2025, SB502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Limitation on certain purchasers. (1) An investment firm may not enter
into an executory contract to purchase a single-family dwelling that is listed for sale before the 45th day after
the date the home is listed.
(2) A contract entered into in violation of this section is voidable by the seller at any time before the
contract is fully executed.
(3) As used in this section, "investment firm" means a corporation or trust engaged in the business
of investing the pooled capital of investors in financial securities.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 70, chapter 1, part 5, and the provisions of Title 70, chapter 1, part 5, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that matured,
penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 502